Utah statutes.
26-21-3.   Health Facility Committee -- Members -- Terms -- Organization --
Meetings.
(1)  The Health Facility Committee created by Section 26-1-7 consists of 15
members appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.  The
appointed members shall be knowledgeable about health care facilities and
issues.  The membership of the committee is:
(a)  one physician, licensed to practice medicine and surgery under Title 58,
Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah
Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, who is a graduate of a regularly chartered
medical school;
(b)  one hospital administrator;
(c)  one hospital trustee;
(d)  one representative of a freestanding ambulatory surgical facility;
(e)  one representative of an ambulatory surgical facility that is affiliated
with a hospital;
(f)  two representatives of the nursing care facility industry;
(g)  one registered nurse, licensed to practice under Title 58, Chapter 31b,
Nurse Practice Act;
(h)  one professional in the field of mental retardation not affiliated with a
nursing care facility;
(i)  one licensed architect or engineer with expertise in health care
facilities;
(j)  two representatives of assisted living facilities licensed under this
chapter;
(k) two consumers, one of whom has an interest in or expertise in geriatric
care; and
(l)  one representative from either a home health care provider or a hospice
provider.
(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), members shall be appointed
for a term of four years.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that
approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.
(c)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term by the governor, giving
consideration to recommendations made by the committee, with the consent of
the Senate.
(d)  A member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms or ten
consecutive years, whichever is less.  However, a member may continue to serve
as a member until he is replaced.
(e)  The committee shall annually elect from its membership a chair and vice
chair.
(f)  The committee shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently as
determined by the chair or five members of the committee.
(g)  Eight members constitute a quorum.  A vote of the majority of the members
present constitutes action of the committee.
